Hawaii statutes.
§291C-223 Summons or citation for illegal
use of high occupancy vehicle lane. Whenever any motor vehicle is observed
operating in a high occu­pancy vehicle lane without the prescribed number of
passengers, the officer observ­ing the vehicle shall:

(1) Cause a summons or citation as described in
section 291C-165 to be issued at the scene of the violation to the operator of
the vehicle; or

(2) Make every reasonable effort to be seen by the
operator of the vehicle and record evidence of the violation by taking any
information displayed on the vehicle that may identify its registered owner and
cause a summons or citation as described in section 291C-165 to be sent by
certified or registered mail, with a return receipt that is postmarked within
forty-eight hours of the time of the incident, to the registered owner of the
vehicle at the address on record at the vehicle licensing division. If the end
of the forty-eight hour period falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, then
the ending period shall run until the end of the next day which is not a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. Upon receipt, the registered owner shall be
given fourteen days to respond to the summons or citation by:

(A) Paying a fine by mail; or

(B) Requesting that a hearing be set on the
matter.

A mail receipt signed by the registered owner is
prima facie evidence of notification. [L 1993, c 224, pt of §1; am L 2000, c
240, §5; am L 2002, c 58, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next